Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-301
Supervision and control; powers of Department of Banking and Finance.

The Department of Banking and Finance shall have power to issue permits to and shall have general supervision and control of all building and loan associations as defined in sections 8-301 to 8-340.01.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 1, p. 723;

C.S.1922, § 8083;

C.S.1929, § 8-301;

R.S.1943, § 8-301;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 7.

Supervision and control extends to branches. First Fed. Sav. & Loan Assn. v. Department of Banking, 187 Neb. 562, 192 N.W.2d 736 (1971).